Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2248
Association; duties.

The association shall:

(1) Encourage development and implementation of uniform criteria for sentencing criminals;

(2) Participate in planning and presenting institutes and seminars for all judges in this state who sentence criminals or juveniles to discuss problems related to sentencing criminals or juveniles;

(3) Participate in planning and presenting orientation programs for new judges, such programs to include discussions of sentencing alternatives, procedures, and purposes;

(4) Visit from time to time correctional facilities of this state;

(5) Encourage creation and development of community resources of value to the probation system;

(6) Conduct such other programs of whatever nature of interest to its members;

(7) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper to carry out its responsibilities; and

(8) Participate in planning and presenting institutes and seminars for all county employees who work in the judicial branch of government.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 536, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 489, § 9.